tr_TR.aff
FLAG num
SFX 16070 N 1
SFX 16070 0 ebilmesinin .
SFX 16071 N 1
SFX 16071 0 lerinine .
SFX 16073 N 1
SFX 16073 0 tebilecekler .
SFX 16072 N 1
SFX 16072 0 lendirmeyeceklerini .
SFX 16074 N 1
SFX 16074 0 tamadığına .
SFX 16076 N 1
SFX 16076 0 laşamayan .
SFX 16075 N 1
SFX 16075 0 ışların .
SFX 16077 N 1
SFX 16077 0 lenmeyişi .
SFX 16078 N 1
SFX 16078 0 yabileceklerinden .
SFX 16080 N 1
SFX 16080 0 cularıyla .
SFX 16079 N 1
SFX 16079 0 tirmişti .
SFX 16081 N 1
SFX 16081 0 tıldıktan .
SFX 16083 N 1
SFX 16083 0 dirdin .
SFX 16082 N 1
SFX 16082 0 icisini .
SFX 16084 N 1
SFX 16084 0 malığına .
SFX 16085 N 1
SFX 16085 0 leşmelerde .
SFX 16086 N 1
SFX 16086 0 dirdik .
SFX 16087 N 1
SFX 16087 0 dirdim .
SFX 16089 N 1
SFX 16089 0 meseniz .
SFX 16088 N 1
SFX 16088 0 ıştırdığını .
SFX 16090 N 1
SFX 16090 0 lığında .
SFX 16091 N 1
SFX 16091 0 ılışlarından .
SFX 16092 N 1
SFX 16092 0 lüyken .
SFX 16094 N 1
SFX 16094 0 uyorlar .
SFX 16093 N 1
SFX 16093 0 landırsa .
SFX 16095 N 1
SFX 16095 0 lanırsın .
SFX 16096 N 1
SFX 16096 0 maları .
SFX 16097 N 1
SFX 16097 0 tırılmazsa .
SFX 16098 N 1
SFX 16098 0 leşeceğinden .
SFX 16099 N 1
SFX 16099 0 imlerle .
SFX 16100 N 1
SFX 16100 0 tmayanlar .
SFX 16102 N 1
SFX 16102 0 imlerin .
SFX 16101 N 1
SFX 16101 0 ılmazlığını .
SFX 16103 N 1
SFX 16103 0 landırma .
SFX 16104 N 1
SFX 16104 0 laşmadığı .
SFX 16105 N 1
SFX 16105 0 leniyorlardı .
SFX 16106 N 1
SFX 16106 0 'daydı .
SFX 16107 N 1
SFX 16107 0 durmamış .
SFX 16109 N 1
SFX 16109 0 emeyeceğiyle .
SFX 16108 N 1
SFX 16108 0 ücülüğündeki .
SFX 16110 N 1
SFX 16110 0 lanabiliyor .
SFX 16112 N 1
SFX 16112 0 nacaklarına .
SFX 16111 N 1
SFX 16111 0 laşmazken .
SFX 16113 N 1
SFX 16113 0 ılacağımı .
SFX 16114 N 1
SFX 16114 0 mememizin .
SFX 16115 N 1
SFX 16115 0 ıştırmıştır .
SFX 16117 N 1
SFX 16117 0 memeli .
SFX 16116 N 1
SFX 16116 0 ileceklerine .
SFX 16118 N 1
SFX 16118 0 dirildiğinde .
SFX 16120 N 1
SFX 16120 0 ileceklerini .
SFX 16119 N 1
SFX 16119 0 mıyordunuz .
SFX 16121 N 1
SFX 16121 0 lanmalarıyla .
SFX 16122 N 1
SFX 16122 0 indeyse .
SFX 16124 N 1
SFX 16124 0 dirilerek .
SFX 16123 N 1
SFX 16123 0 lılıklarında .
SFX 16125 N 1
SFX 16125 0 'taki .
SFX 16127 N 1
SFX 16127 0 ılacağını .
SFX 16126 N 1
SFX 16126 0 cısına .
SFX 16129 N 1
SFX 16129 0 lendirenler .
SFX 16128 N 1
SFX 16128 0 tirmesiyle .
SFX 16131 N 1
SFX 16131 0 undansa .
SFX 16130 N 1
SFX 16130 0 tüldüğünde .
SFX 16132 N 1
SFX 16132 0 nmaları .
SFX 16136 N 1
SFX 16136 0 liydik .
SFX 16135 N 1
SFX 16135 0 ılsınlar .
SFX 16134 N 1
SFX 16134 0 tırırdım .
SFX 16133 N 1
SFX 16133 0 ülemeyecekleri .
SFX 16138 N 1
SFX 16138 0 abilmişse .
SFX 16137 N 1
SFX 16137 0 liydin .
SFX 16139 N 1
SFX 16139 0 liydim .
SFX 16141 N 1
SFX 16141 0 mememi .
SFX 16140 N 1
SFX 16140 0 ulmamışlar .
SFX 16143 N 1
SFX 16143 0 lanılamadığı .
SFX 16142 N 1
SFX 16142 0 mememe .
SFX 16145 N 1
SFX 16145 0 nızla .
SFX 16144 N 1
SFX 16144 0 temezsek .
SFX 16146 N 1
SFX 16146 0 layabildiklerini .
SFX 16148 N 1
SFX 16148 0 lanırsanız .
SFX 16147 N 1
SFX 16147 0 leştirmezse .
SFX 16149 N 1
SFX 16149 0 inemeyeceği .
SFX 16150 N 1
SFX 16150 0 ülemediğinden .
SFX 16151 N 1
SFX 16151 0 layabildiklerine .
SFX 16152 N 1
SFX 16152 0 andım .
SFX 16153 N 1
SFX 16153 0 liğindense .
SFX 16156 N 1
SFX 16156 0 letemeyeceğini .
SFX 16155 N 1
SFX 16155 0 nilmeye .
SFX 16154 N 1
SFX 16154 0 dirilemediğine .
SFX 16157 N 1
SFX 16157 0 abilmişti .
SFX 16158 N 1
SFX 16158 0 casının .
SFX 16159 N 1
SFX 16159 0 dirilemediğini .
SFX 16160 N 1
SFX 16160 0 liğinse .
SFX 16162 N 1
SFX 16162 0 lenişe .
SFX 16161 N 1
SFX 16161 0 ebilmesinde .
SFX 16163 N 1
SFX 16163 0 andır .
SFX 16165 N 1
SFX 16165 0 lenişi .
SFX 16164 N 1
SFX 16164 0 layacağında .
SFX 16166 N 1
SFX 16166 0 mmiş .
SFX 16167 N 1
SFX 16167 0 meyişlerinden .
SFX 16169 N 1
SFX 16169 0 ılmadı .
SFX 16168 N 1
SFX 16168 0 lanıverdi .
SFX 16170 N 1
SFX 16170 0 ulanlara .
SFX 16171 N 1
SFX 16171 0 ilebilmesini .
SFX 16172 N 1
SFX 16172 0 cılığıyla .
SFX 16174 N 1
SFX 16174 0 ilebilmesine .
SFX 16173 N 1
SFX 16173 0 dırılmamıştır .
SFX 16175 N 1
SFX 16175 0 desin .
SFX 16177 N 1
SFX 16177 0 ındakilere .
SFX 16176 N 1
SFX 16176 0 tırılmasın .
SFX 16178 N 1
SFX 16178 0 nmüş .
SFX 16180 N 1
SFX 16180 0 ulmaz .
SFX 16179 N 1
SFX 16179 0 ebilirken .
SFX 16181 N 1
SFX 16181 0 uşlarındaki .
SFX 16183 N 1
SFX 16183 0 lemesini .
SFX 16182 N 1
SFX 16182 0 ılabilmiştir .
SFX 16184 N 1
SFX 16184 0 ındaydılar .
SFX 16185 N 1
SFX 16185 0 ulmak .
SFX 16186 N 1
SFX 16186 0 ındakileri .
SFX 16187 N 1
SFX 16187 0 ulmam .
SFX 16188 N 1
SFX 16188 0 lanmazdık .
SFX 16190 N 1
SFX 16190 0 laşmada .
SFX 16189 N 1
SFX 16189 0 lanmazdım .
SFX 16192 N 1
SFX 16192 0 ukluklarının .
SFX 16191 N 1
SFX 16191 0 muşluğum .
SFX 16193 N 1
SFX 16193 0 leneceksiniz .
SFX 16195 N 1
SFX 16195 0 nmışlıklarını .
SFX 16194 N 1
SFX 16194 0 mıyorlarmış .
SFX 16197 N 1
SFX 16197 0 lemesiyle .
SFX 16196 N 1
SFX 16196 0 muşluğun .
SFX 16198 N 1
SFX 16198 0 dırttığını .
SFX 16200 N 1
SFX 16200 0 çıların .
SFX 16199 N 1
SFX 16199 0 tiklerinin .
SFX 16201 N 1
SFX 16201 0 letilmediği .
SFX 16202 N 1
SFX 16202 0 diklerimizden .
SFX 16204 N 1
SFX 16204 0 tmediğinin .
SFX 16203 N 1
SFX 16203 0 uşmayacağını .
SFX 16205 N 1
SFX 16205 0 tirmişiz .
SFX 16206 N 1
SFX 16206 0 dırılmasında .
SFX 16207 N 1
SFX 16207 0 enlerdenim .
SFX 16208 N 1
SFX 16208 0 ndırmaktadır .
SFX 16210 N 1
SFX 16210 0 memişse .
SFX 16209 N 1
SFX 16209 0 sındakilerini .
SFX 16211 N 1
SFX 16211 0 lığımdaki .
SFX 16212 N 1
SFX 16212 0 lemişsiniz .
SFX 16214 N 1
SFX 16214 0 tiğine .
SFX 16213 N 1
SFX 16213 0 tikleriniz .
SFX 16215 N 1
SFX 16215 0 tirmişim .
SFX 16216 N 1
SFX 16216 0 lemesine .
SFX 16217 N 1
SFX 16217 0 mişimdir .
SFX 16218 N 1
SFX 16218 0 tiğini .
SFX 16219 N 1
SFX 16219 0 lideki .
SFX 16220 N 1
SFX 16220 0 laşabildik .
SFX 16221 N 1
SFX 16221 0 abilmenin .
SFX 16222 N 1
SFX 16222 0 ştırarak .
SFX 16224 N 1
SFX 16224 0 lığınla .
SFX 16223 N 1
SFX 16223 0 lanabilirlik .
SFX 16225 N 1
SFX 16225 0 tirmelerinden .
SFX 16226 N 1
SFX 16226 0 dekilere .
SFX 16227 N 1
SFX 16227 0 dekileri .
SFX 16229 N 1
SFX 16229 0 amamışsak .
SFX 16228 N 1
SFX 16228 0 leyişinden .
SFX 16230 N 1
SFX 16230 0 imlerde .
SFX 16232 N 1
SFX 16232 0 nişleri .
SFX 16231 N 1
SFX 16231 0 tiğime .
SFX 16233 N 1
SFX 16233 0 ndaysa .
SFX 16234 N 1
SFX 16234 0 çiliğinden .
SFX 16235 N 1
SFX 16235 0 sısından .
SFX 16236 N 1
SFX 16236 0 ilemeyişi .
SFX 16237 N 1
SFX 16237 0 tiğimi .
SFX 16239 N 1
SFX 16239 0 yemeyecek .
SFX 16238 N 1
SFX 16238 0 ılamayabileceğini .
SFX 16240 N 1
SFX 16240 0 nabilme .
SFX 16241 N 1
SFX 16241 0 lanmalarındaki .
SFX 16243 N 1
SFX 16243 0 memişti .
SFX 16242 N 1
SFX 16242 0 dürdük .
SFX 16244 N 1
SFX 16244 0 nacaklarını .
SFX 16245 N 1
SFX 16245 0 ılmama .
SFX 16248 N 1
SFX 16248 0 malıydınız .
SFX 16247 N 1
SFX 16247 0 latmışlardı .
SFX 16246 N 1
SFX 16246 0 unacağı .
SFX 16249 N 1
SFX 16249 0 şımlarını .
SFX 16250 N 1
SFX 16250 0 yebilirdi .
SFX 16251 N 1
SFX 16251 0 lanımında .
SFX 16253 N 1
SFX 16253 0 tılabilecek .
SFX 16252 N 1
SFX 16252 0 sizken .
SFX 16254 N 1
SFX 16254 0 malara .
SFX 16256 N 1
SFX 16256 0 masalar .
SFX 16255 N 1
SFX 16255 0 enlerine .
SFX 16258 N 1
SFX 16258 0 nmıyor .
SFX 16257 N 1
SFX 16257 0 umlarındaki .
SFX 16259 N 1
SFX 16259 0 mesen .
SFX 16261 N 1
SFX 16261 0 ebildik .
SFX 16260 N 1
SFX 16260 0 mesem .
SFX 16263 N 1
SFX 16263 0 enlerini .
SFX 16262 N 1
SFX 16262 0 durtmuş .
SFX 16264 N 1
SFX 16264 0 mesek .
SFX 16267 N 1
SFX 16267 0 ışamadığına .
SFX 16266 N 1
SFX 16266 0 imdeyse .
SFX 16265 N 1
SFX 16265 0 dirmemiştir .
SFX 16268 N 1
SFX 16268 0 lıyorsanız .
SFX 16270 N 1
SFX 16270 0 cilikte .
SFX 16269 N 1
SFX 16269 0 undandı .
SFX 16271 N 1
SFX 16271 0 ebildim .
SFX 16272 N 1
SFX 16272 0 ebildin .
SFX 16274 N 1
SFX 16274 0 nmayışı .
SFX 16273 N 1
SFX 16273 0 yecekse .
SFX 16275 N 1
SFX 16275 0 nmelere .
SFX 16276 N 1
SFX 16276 0 ılışlarının .
SFX 16278 N 1
SFX 16278 0 ıcılıklarıyla .
SFX 16277 N 1
SFX 16277 0 ıyorumdur .
SFX 16279 N 1
SFX 16279 0 ıcılığına .
SFX 16280 N 1
SFX 16280 0 nmeleri .
SFX 16283 N 1
SFX 16283 0 ulanları .
SFX 16282 N 1
SFX 16282 0 ilemeden .
SFX 16281 N 1
SFX 16281 0 abilmişiz .
SFX 16284 N 1
SFX 16284 0 ttıkça .
SFX 16285 N 1
SFX 16285 0 lılaştırmaya .
SFX 16286 N 1
SFX 16286 0 dırıcılıklarının .
SFX 16287 N 1
SFX 16287 0 landığımızı .
SFX 16288 N 1
SFX 16288 0 indeyiz .
SFX 16289 N 1
SFX 16289 0 landıramadıklarını .
SFX 16290 N 1
SFX 16290 0 lığınsa .
SFX 16291 N 1
SFX 16291 0 ulmadığının .
SFX 16293 N 1
SFX 16293 0 leşebilmesi .
SFX 16292 N 1
SFX 16292 0 yıcıyı .
SFX 16295 N 1
SFX 16295 0 ttığının .
SFX 16294 N 1
SFX 16294 0 lamadıklarının .
SFX 16296 N 1
SFX 16296 0 üşe .
SFX 16297 N 1
SFX 16297 0 lıksız .
SFX 16299 N 1
SFX 16299 0 yecekti .
SFX 16298 N 1
SFX 16298 0 tirilebilecek .
SFX 16301 N 1
SFX 16301 0 ttığınız .
SFX 16300 N 1
SFX 16300 0 şmasıdır .
SFX 16302 N 1
SFX 16302 0 uşundan .
SFX 16303 N 1
SFX 16303 0 muzdur .
SFX 16304 N 1
SFX 16304 0 sallaşmanın .
SFX 16305 N 1
SFX 16305 0 tmalıydı .
SFX 16306 N 1
SFX 16306 0 şmadığın .
SFX 16307 N 1
SFX 16307 0 tığımızı .
SFX 16309 N 1
SFX 16309 0 ndığıyla .
SFX 16308 N 1
SFX 16308 0 leştirecekti .
SFX 16311 N 1
SFX 16311 0 larındaysa .
SFX 16310 N 1
SFX 16310 0 ılmasa .
SFX 16313 N 1
SFX 16313 0 temediklerinde .
SFX 16312 N 1
SFX 16312 0 tmesiydi .
SFX 16314 N 1
SFX 16314 0 yacağından .
SFX 16316 N 1
SFX 16316 0 ılmalı .
SFX 16315 N 1
SFX 16315 0 leşmesin .
SFX 16317 N 1
SFX 16317 0 ebildiniz .
SFX 16318 N 1
SFX 16318 0 lanabilirler .
SFX 16319 N 1
SFX 16319 0 laşamıyorsun .
SFX 16321 N 1
SFX 16321 0 indeyim .
SFX 16320 N 1
SFX 16320 0 yebilmelidir .
SFX 16323 N 1
SFX 16323 0 ıklar .
SFX 16322 N 1
SFX 16322 0 ılmıştı .
SFX 16324 N 1
SFX 16324 0 lattırdığını .
SFX 16325 N 1
SFX 16325 0 ılsaydı .
SFX 16326 N 1
SFX 16326 0 lemeyeceklerdir .
SFX 16328 N 1
SFX 16328 0 inmezliği .
SFX 16327 N 1
SFX 16327 0 ıcısıydı .
SFX 16330 N 1
SFX 16330 0 nızda .
SFX 16329 N 1
SFX 16329 0 lendirmişti .
SFX 16331 N 1
SFX 16331 0 çisine .
SFX 16332 N 1
SFX 16332 0 turduğunuz .
SFX 16333 N 1
SFX 16333 0 dirilecektir .
SFX 16334 N 1
SFX 16334 0 'sıyla .
SFX 16336 N 1
SFX 16336 0 sizleştiği .
SFX 16335 N 1
SFX 16335 0 sizleşen .
SFX 16337 N 1
SFX 16337 0 lamalarıydı .
SFX 16338 N 1
SFX 16338 0 latan .
SFX 16339 N 1
SFX 16339 0 abilmektedirler .
SFX 16341 N 1
SFX 16341 0 mesidir .
SFX 16340 N 1
SFX 16340 0 ydık .
SFX 16342 N 1
SFX 16342 0 layabilmesinin .
SFX 16344 N 1
SFX 16344 0 ydım .
SFX 16343 N 1
SFX 16343 0 turduğunun .
SFX 16347 N 1
SFX 16347 0 'nün .
SFX 16346 N 1
SFX 16346 0 lüklerde .
SFX 16345 N 1
SFX 16345 0 leştirmişim .
SFX 16348 N 1
SFX 16348 0 nabilir .
SFX 16349 N 1
SFX 16349 0 çisini .
SFX 16351 N 1
SFX 16351 0 leştirmişiz .
SFX 16350 N 1
SFX 16350 0 şmişler .
SFX 16352 N 1
SFX 16352 0 lardaysa .
SFX 16354 N 1
SFX 16354 0 ydın .
SFX 16353 N 1
SFX 16353 0 lenmemişlerdir .
SFX 16355 N 1
SFX 16355 0 nmelerindeki .
SFX 16356 N 1
SFX 16356 0 urdu .
SFX 16357 N 1
SFX 16357 0 ndığıydı .
SFX 16358 N 1
SFX 16358 0 leştirebildiklerini .
SFX 16359 N 1
SFX 16359 0 sundakiler .
SFX 16360 N 1
SFX 16360 0 cılığımızın .
SFX 16361 N 1
SFX 16361 0 dırmamak .
SFX 16362 N 1
SFX 16362 0 ılmaya .
SFX 16363 N 1
SFX 16363 0 yeceğinizi .
SFX 16364 N 1
SFX 16364 0 eceklerin .
SFX 16365 N 1
SFX 16365 0 layabildiğimiz .
SFX 16367 N 1
SFX 16367 0 nmışa .
SFX 16366 N 1
SFX 16366 0 lemesiydi .
SFX 16368 N 1
SFX 16368 0 şemeyeceği .
SFX 16369 N 1
SFX 16369 0 direceklerine .
SFX 16370 N 1
SFX 16370 0 letmeyecek .
SFX 16371 N 1
SFX 16371 0 direceklerini .
SFX 16372 N 1
SFX 16372 0 sızlığıdır .
SFX 16373 N 1
SFX 16373 0 lılarındandı .
SFX 16374 N 1
SFX 16374 0 latmayan .
SFX 16375 N 1
SFX 16375 0 amasaydı .
SFX 16376 N 1
SFX 16376 0 dirmemeleri .
SFX 16377 N 1
SFX 16377 0 ılabilmişti .
SFX 16381 N 1
SFX 16381 0 üşü .
SFX 16380 N 1
SFX 16380 0 ülmesin .
SFX 16379 N 1
SFX 16379 0 ilmeyerek .
SFX 16378 N 1
SFX 16378 0 'dalar .
SFX 16383 N 1
SFX 16383 0 laşmama .
SFX 16382 N 1
SFX 16382 0 ılmışlardır .
SFX 16385 N 1
SFX 16385 0 leştirilmeyeceğini .
